dictionaries/hsb/hsb.aff
SFX m Y 108
SFX m 0 a [^ń]
SFX m ń nja ń
SFX m 0 ej [^ń]
SFX m ń njej ń
SFX m 0 om [^ń]
SFX m ń njom ń
SFX m 0 u [sczkjlhščžć]
SFX m 0 je [bmnrpw]
SFX m ń nju ń
SFX m t će t
SFX m d dźe [^a]d
SFX m d dźe [^jl]ad
SFX m d dźe [^h]lad
SFX m d dźe [^r]jad
SFX m ad edźe hlad
SFX m ad edźe rjad
SFX m 0 i [kh]
SFX m 0 y [^khlčšžź]
SFX m 0 e [jlčšžź]
SFX m ń nje ń
SFX m 0 aj [^jlčšžźń]
SFX m 0 ej l
SFX m 0 ow [^ń]
SFX m ń njow ń
SFX m 0 omaj [^ń]
SFX m ń njomaj ń
SFX m 0 am [^ń]
SFX m 0 ami [^l]
SFX m ń njemi ń
SFX m 0 emi [jl]
SFX m 0 ach [^ń]
SFX m ń njach ń
SFX m eń nja w[ou]heń
SFX m eń njej w[ou]heń
SFX m eń njom w[ou]heń
SFX m eń nju w[ou]heń
SFX m eń njow w[ou]heń
SFX m eń njomaj w[ou]heń
SFX m eń nje w[ou]heń
SFX m eń njam w[ou]heń
SFX m eń njemi w[ou]heń
SFX m eń njach w[ou]heń
SFX m otoł ótła otoł
SFX m otoł ótłej otoł
SFX m otoł ótłom otoł
SFX m otoł ótle otoł
SFX m otoł ótłaj otoł
SFX m otoł ótłow otoł
SFX m otoł ótłomaj otoł
SFX m otoł ótły otoł
SFX m otoł ótłam otoł
SFX m otoł ótłami otoł
SFX m osoł ósła osoł
SFX m osoł ósłej osoł
SFX m osoł ósłom osoł
SFX m osoł ósle osoł
SFX m osoł ósłaj osoł
SFX m osoł ósłow osoł
SFX m osoł ósłomaj osoł
SFX m osoł ósły osoł
SFX m osoł ósłam osoł
SFX m osoł ósłami osoł
SFX m ozoł ózła ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózłej ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózłom ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózle ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózłaj ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózłow ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózłomaj ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózły ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózłam ozoł
SFX m ozoł ózłami ozoł
SFX m 0 owy [^ń]
SFX m 0 owa [^ń]
SFX m 0 owe [^ń]
SFX m 0 oweho [^ń]
SFX m 0 oweje [^ń]
SFX m 0 owej [^ń]
SFX m 0 owemu [^ń]
SFX m 0 owu [^ń]
SFX m 0 owym [^ń]
SFX m 0 owaj [^ń]
SFX m 0 owymaj [^ń]
SFX m 0 owi [^ń]
SFX m 0 owych [^ń]
SFX m 0 owymi [^ń]
SFX m 0 owosć [^ń]
SFX m 0 owosće [^ń]
SFX m 0 owosći [^ń]
SFX m 0 owosću [^ń]
SFX m ń njowy ń
SFX m ń njowa ń
SFX m ń njowe ń
SFX m ń njoweho ń
SFX m ń njoweje ń
SFX m ń njowej ń
SFX m ń njowemu ń
SFX m ń njowu ń
SFX m ń njowym ń
SFX m ń njowaj ń
SFX m ń njowymaj ń
SFX m ń njowi ń
SFX m ń njowych ń
SFX m ń njowymi ń
SFX m ń njowosć ń
SFX m ń njowosće ń
SFX m ń njowosći ń
SFX m ń njowosću ń

SFX n Y 19
SFX n o enja jo
SFX n o enju jo
SFX n o enjom jo
SFX n o eni jo
SFX n o enjow jo
SFX n o enjomaj jo
SFX n o enjam jo
SFX n o enjemi jo
SFX n o enjach jo
SFX n o eško jo
SFX n o eška jo
SFX n o ešku jo
SFX n o eškom jo
SFX n o ešce jo
SFX n o eškow jo
SFX n o eškomaj jo
SFX n o eškam jo
SFX n o eškemi jo
SFX n o eškach jo

SFX o Y 30
SFX o o a o
SFX o o u o
SFX o o om o
SFX o o je [bmnprw]o
SFX o ło le [^z]ło
SFX o ło lě z]zło
SFX o ło le z]zło
SFX o ko ce [^l][^o]ko
SFX o oko óce mloko
SFX o to će to
SFX o o źe do
SFX o o y [szc]o
SFX o o ow o
SFX o o omaj o
SFX o o am o
SFX o o ami [bmnprwsczdt]o
SFX o o emi [^bmnprwsczdt]o
SFX o o i [^bmnprwsczdtj]o
SFX o jo i jo
SFX o o ach o
SFX o e a e
SFX o e u e
SFX o e om e
SFX o e ow e
SFX o e omaj e
SFX o e am e
SFX o e emi e
SFX o e ach e
SFX o je i je
SFX o e i [^j]e

SFX t Y 36
SFX t o eća o
SFX t o eću o
SFX t o ećom o
SFX t o eći o
SFX t o ećow o
SFX t o ećomaj o
SFX t o ata o
SFX t o atow o
SFX t o atam o
SFX t o atami o
SFX t o atach o
SFX t o atko o
SFX t o atka o
SFX t o atku o
SFX t o atkom o
SFX t o atce o
SFX t o atkow o
SFX t o atkomaj o
SFX t o atkam o
SFX t o atkami o
SFX t o atkach o
SFX t o atkowy o
SFX t o atkowa o
SFX t o atkowe o
SFX t o atkoweho o
SFX t o atkoweje o
SFX t o atkowemu o
SFX t o atkowej o
SFX t o atkowu o
SFX t o atkowym o
SFX t o atkowaj o
SFX t o atkoweju o
SFX t o atkowymaj o
SFX t o atkowi o
SFX t o atkowych o
SFX t o atkowymi o

SFX u Y 54
SFX u er ra er
SFX u er rej er
SFX u er rom er
SFX u er ru er
SFX u er rje er
SFX u er raj er
SFX u er row er
SFX u er romaj er
SFX u er ram er
SFX u er rami er
SFX u er rach er
SFX u or rej or
SFX u or ra or
SFX u or rej or
SFX u or rom or
SFX u or ru or
SFX u or rje or
SFX u or raj or
SFX u or row or
SFX u or romaj or
SFX u or ram or
SFX u or rami or
SFX u or rach or
SFX u or rej or
SFX u er rowy er
SFX u er rowa er
SFX u er rowe er
SFX u er roweho er
SFX u er roweje er
SFX u er rowemu er
SFX u er rowej er
SFX u er rowym er
SFX u er rowu er
SFX u er rowaj er
SFX u er roweju er
SFX u er rowymaj er
SFX u er rowi er
SFX u er rowych er
SFX u er rowymi er
SFX u or rowy or
SFX u or rowa or
SFX u or rowe or
SFX u or roweho or
SFX u or roweje or
SFX u or rowemu or
SFX u or rowej or
SFX u or rowym or
SFX u or rowu or
SFX u or rowaj or
SFX u or roweju or
SFX u or rowymaj or
SFX u or rowi or
SFX u or rowych or
SFX u or rowymi or

SFX v Y 2
SFX v er ry er
SFX v or ry or

SFX w Y 1
SFX w er rojo er

SFX V Y 25
SFX V rać jerjech [bp]rać
SFX V rać jerjech [bp]rać
SFX V rać jerješe [bp]rać
SFX V rać jerjechmoj [bp]rać
SFX V rać jerještej [bp]rać
SFX V rać jerještaj [bp]rać
SFX V rać jerjechmy [bp]rać
SFX V rać jerješće [bp]rać
SFX V rać jerjechu [bp]rać
SFX V rać erjechu [^bp]rać
SFX V rać erješe [^bp]rać
SFX V rać erjechmoj [^bp]rać
SFX V rać erještej [^bp]rać
SFX V rać erještaj [^bp]rać
SFX V rać erjechmy [^bp]rać
SFX V rać erješće [^bp]rać
SFX V łać ćelechu słać
SFX V łać ćelechu słać
SFX V łać ćeleše słać
SFX V łać ćelechmoj słać
SFX V łać ćeleštej słać
SFX V łać ćeleštaj słać
SFX V łać ćelechmy słać
SFX V łać ćelešće słać
SFX V łać ćelechu słać

SFX X Y 72
SFX X c žach óc
SFX X c žeše óc
SFX X c žachmoj óc
SFX X c žeštej óc
SFX X c žeštaj óc
SFX X c žechmy óc
SFX X c žešće óc
SFX X c žachu óc
SFX X eć ach ědźeć
SFX X ć eše ědźeć
SFX X eć achmoj ědźeć
SFX X ć štej ědźeć
SFX X ć štaj ědźeć
SFX X eć achmy ědźeć
SFX X ć šće ědźeć
SFX X eć achu ědźeć
SFX X ać ach ać
SFX X ć še ać
SFX X ać achmoj ać
SFX X ć štaj ać
SFX X ć štej ać
SFX X ać achmy ać
SFX X ć šće ać
SFX X ać achu ać
SFX X eć ach eć
SFX X ć še eć
SFX X eć achmoj eć
SFX X ć štaj eć
SFX X ć štej eć
SFX X eć achmy eć
SFX X ć šće eć
SFX X eć achu eć
SFX X ić ach [^bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić eše [^bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić achmoj [^bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić eštaj [^bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić eštej [^bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić achmy [^bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić ešće [^bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić achu [^bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić jach [bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić ješe [bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić jachmoj [bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić ještaj [bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić ještej [bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić jachmy [bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić ješće [bmnprw]ić
SFX X ić jachu [bmnprw]ić
SFX X nyć njech nyć
SFX X nyć nješe nyć
SFX X nyć njechmoj nyć
SFX X nyć nještaj nyć
SFX X nyć nještej nyć
SFX X nyć njechmy nyć
SFX X nyć nješće nyć
SFX X nyć njechu nyć
SFX X syć šach syć
SFX X syć šeše syć
SFX X syć šachmoj syć
SFX X syć šeštaj syć
SFX X syć šeštej syć
SFX X syć šachmy syć
SFX X syć šešće syć
SFX X syć šachu syć
SFX X zyć žach zyć
SFX X zyć žeše zyć
SFX X zyć žachmoj zyć
SFX X zyć žeštaj zyć
SFX X zyć žeštej zyć
SFX X zyć žachmy zyć
SFX X zyć žešće zyć
SFX X zyć žachu zyć

SFX U Y 47
SFX U eć mu jeć
SFX U eć mješ jeć
SFX U eć mje jeć
SFX U eć mjemoj jeć
SFX U eć mjetej jeć
SFX U eć mjetaj jeć
SFX U eć mjemy jeć
SFX U eć mjeće jeć
SFX U eć mi jeć
SFX U eć mimoj jeć
SFX U eć mitej jeć
SFX U eć mitaj jeć
SFX U eć mimy jeć
SFX U eć miće jeć
SFX U eć ał jeć
SFX U eć ała jeć
SFX U eć ało jeć
SFX U eć ałe jeć
SFX U eć ałoj jeć
SFX U eć ałej jeć
SFX U ć li jeć
SFX U eć aty jeć
SFX U eć ata jeć
SFX U eć ate jeć
SFX U eć ateho jeć
SFX U eć atoh jeć
SFX U eć ateje jeć
SFX U eć atemu jeć
SFX U eć atom jeć
SFX U eć atej jeć
SFX U eć atu jeć
SFX U eć atym jeć
SFX U eć ataj jeć
SFX U eć ateju jeć
SFX U eć atymaj jeć
SFX U 0 i jeć
SFX U eć atych jeć
SFX U eć atymi jeć
SFX U 0 e jeć
SFX U 0 a jeć
SFX U 0 u jeć
SFX U 0 om jeć
SFX U 0 ow jeć
SFX U 0 omaj jeć
SFX U 0 am jeć
SFX U 0 emi jeć
SFX U 0 ach jeć
